New Jersey, session 222, S3832.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and except as provided in subsection b. of this section, a community garden that operates an on-site composting system shall not be required by the Department of Environmental Protection to obtain a permit, approval, or other authorization issued by the department pursuant to the "Solid Waste Management Act," P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-1 et seq.), the "New Jersey Statewide Mandatory Source Separation and Recycling Act," P.L.1987, c.102 (C.13:1E-99.11 et al.), the "Air Pollution Control Act (1954)," P.L.1954, c.212 (C.26:2C-1 et seq.), or the "Water Pollution Control Act," P.L.1977, c.74 (C.58:10A-1 et seq.), or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, for the operation of the on-site composting system provided that: (1) the property on which the composting system is located is exclusively used as a community garden; (2) the composting system only uses vegetative waste generated by the community garden; and (3) all compost generated from the composting system is used on-site exclusively for the community garden. b. A community garden that operates an on-site compositing system may be required by the Department of Environmental Protection to obtain a permit, approval, or other authorization issued pursuant to the "Water Pollution Control Act," P.L.1977, c.74 (C.58:10A-1 et seq.), or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, for the operation of the on-site composting system if the on-site composting system is determined by the Department of Environmental Protection to be a significant discharger of pollutants pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1977, c.74 (C.58:10A-6). c. As used in this section: Community garden means any publicly or privately owned piece of land maintained and cultivated as a garden by members of the surrounding community. Compost means a biologically stable soil amendment that can be used to build soil health and provide nutrients to plants. Composting means the managed, aerobic biological decomposition of organic materials by microorganisms resulting in compost. Composting system means a system utilized for the composting of organic materials. Vegetative waste means waste materials that are produced from the raising of plants in a community garden which includes crop residues, such as stalks, hulls, leaves, as well as non-crop residues, such as leaves, grass clippings, tree parts, shrubbery, and garden wastes. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.